Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4974.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9f. (1) An electric utility shall do all of the following when a service interruption occurs: (a) Reimburse an individual whose utilities are paid for by their landlord and whose service was interrupted for more than 4 but not more than 24 hours, $50.00 or the cost of spoiled food, lodging, or other costs the individual incurred because of the service interruption, whichever is larger. (b) Reimburse an individual whose utilities are paid for by their landlord and whose service was interrupted for more than 24 hours, $200.00 or the cost of spoiled food, lodging, or other costs the individual incurred because of the service interruption, whichever is larger. (c) Reimburse a local unit of government for any costs that the local unit of government incurred because of the service interruption, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) The cost required to dispatch emergency services during the service interruption. (ii) The cost required to operate warming or cooling centers due to unsafe weather during the service interruption. (iii) The cost of operating backup generation during the service interruption. (iv) Other costs incurred to respond to and mitigate the harmful effects of the service interruption. (2) An individual or local unit of government that seeks reimbursement under this section shall submit its account of actual costs to the commission not later than 90 days after the date of the service interruption. The commission shall examine the account and determine what costs the utility shall reimburse. Not later than 30 days after the commission determines what actual costs the utility shall reimburse, the utility shall pay the amount to the individual or the local unit of government. (3) This section is in addition to any other remedy provided by law. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Emergency services" means services provided to the public by police, fire, ambulance, or other first responders. (b) "Service interruption" means a full or partial loss of electric service.